src/phonetics/text2ipa-sme.xfscript
! ... here outputformat is SAMPA:              
!define OUTPUTFORMAT ə -> %@ , ä -> %{ , æ -> %{ , ö -> 2 , ø -> 2 , a -> A , 
!                  n j -> J , ŋ -> N , š -> S , đ -> D ,  ŧ -> T , ɟ -> J \ , 
!                    L -> l %_ %0 , R -> r %_ %0 , M -> m %_ %0 , N -> n %_ %0 , 
!                    Ŋ -> N %_ %0 , V -> v %_ %0 ,
!                   %^ -> %. ;
! note potential problems with J\.

! ... here outputformat is IPA:              
 define OUTPUTFORMAT a -> ɑ ,
                     ç -> s ,
                     đ -> ð ,
                     é -> e e ,
                     í -> i i ,
                   n j -> ɲ ,
                     ò -> o ,
                     ó -> u u ,
                     q -> k ,
                     š -> ʃ ,
                     ŧ -> θ ,
                     þ -> θ ,
                     ü -> y ,
                     x -> k s ,
                     å -> o o ,
                     ä -> æ ,
                     ö -> ø ,
                     w -> β ,
                     W -> ɸ ,
                     L -> l̥ ,
                     R -> r̥ ,
                     M -> m̥ ,
                     N -> n̥ ,
                     Ŋ -> ŋ̊ ,
                     V -> v̥ ,
                     J -> ç , 
                    %^ -> %. ;


define OUTPUTFORMAT2   h -> ʰ || WordBorder [p|t|k] _ Vow ; ! for rules with context...



! ... here outputformat is FUPA:
! define OUTPUTFORMAT a -> ɑ , n j -> ń , đ -> ð ,
!                                          
!                     %^ -> %. ;

define COLONLENGTH   ɑ ɑ -> ɑ ː        || \[a] _ .o.
                     e e -> e ː        || \[e] _ .o.
                     i i -> i ː        || \[i] _ .o.
                     o o -> o ː        || \[o] _ .o.
                     u u -> u ː        || \[u] _ .o.
                     b b -> b ː        || \[b] _ .o.
                     β β -> β ː        || \[β] _ .o.
                     ɸ ɸ -> ɸ ː        || \[ɸ] _ .o.
                     ɟ ɟ -> ɟ ː        || \[ɟ] _ .o.
                     c c -> c ː        || \[c] _ .o.
                     d d -> d ː        || \[d] _ .o.
                     ð ð -> ð ː        || \[ð] _ .o.
                     f f -> f ː        || \[f] _ .o.
                     g g -> g ː        || \[g] _ .o.
                     h h -> h ː        || \[h] _ .o.
                     j j -> j ː        || \[j] _ .o.
                     k k -> k ː        || \[k] _ .o.
                     l l -> l ː        || \[l] _ .o.
                     ʎ ʎ -> ʎ ː        || \[ʎ] _ .o.
                     m m -> m ː        || \[m] _ .o.
                     n n -> n ː        || \[n] _ .o.
                     ɲ ɲ -> ɲ ː        || \[ɲ] _ .o.
                     p p -> p ː        || \[p] _ .o.
                     r r -> r ː        || \[r] _ .o.
                     s s -> s ː        || \[s] _ .o.
                     t t -> t ː        || \[t] _ .o.
                     ʃ ʃ -> ʃ ː        || \[ʃ] _ .o.
                     v v -> v ː        || \[v] _ .o.
                     l̥ l̥ -> l̥ ː        || \[l̥] _ .o.
                     r̥ r̥ -> r̥ ː        || \[r̥] _ .o.
                     m̥ m̥ -> m̥ ː        || \[m̥] _ .o.
                     n̥ n̥ -> n̥ ː        || \[n̥] _ .o.
                     ŋ̊ ŋ̊ -> ŋ̊ ː        || \[ŋ̊] _ .o.
                     v̥ v̥ -> v̥ ː        || \[v̥] _ .o.
                     t ʃ  t ʃ -> t ʃ ː || \[t ʃ ] _ ;

! TT: The last line above is my temporary fix for čč =  t ʃ  t ʃ . TODO: fix

! Then the same with a syllable mark in between (only consonants):
define COLONLENGTHSYLL b %. b -> %. b ː , β %. β -> %. β ː , ɸ %. ɸ -> %. ɸ ː ,
                       ɟ %. ɟ -> %. ɟ ː , c %. c -> %. c ː , d %. d -> %. d ː ,
                       ð %. ð -> %. ð ː , f %. f -> %. f ː , g %. g -> %. g ː , 
                       h %. h -> %. h ː , j %. j -> %. j ː , k %. k -> %. k ː ,
                       l %. l -> %. l ː , ʎ %. ʎ -> %. ʎ ː , m %. m -> %. m ː ,
                       n %. n -> %. n ː , ɲ %. ɲ -> %. ɲ ː , p %. p -> %. p ː ,
                       r %. r -> %. r ː , s %. s -> %. s ː , t %. t -> %. t ː ,
                       ʃ %. ʃ -> %. ʃ ː , v %. v -> %. v ː , l̥ %. l̥ -> %. l̥ ː ,
                       r̥ %. r̥ -> %. r̥ ː , m̥ %. m̥ -> %. m̥ ː , n̥ %. n̥ -> %. n̥ ː , 
                       ŋ̊ %. ŋ̊ -> %. ŋ̊ ː , v̥ %. v̥ -> %. v̥ ː 
                       ;

! ... here outputformat is Finnish orthography:              
! define OUTPUTFORMAT ŋ -> n g , ŧ -> s , đ -> r , š -> s ,
!                       %^ -> %.  ;
! This rule is incomplete!

! Cleaning up

define DummyDeletion Dummy -> 0 ;

define DerBorderSimplification [ ‰» %» %» %# -> %»,
                                       %» %» -> %»,
                                       %» %# -> %# ] ;

define HyphenDeletion [ %- -> 0 ] ;

echo <<Combining...>>

read regex [ 
!    POSTAG .o. 
    down
.o. DerBorderSimplification
.o. DerBorderSimplification
.o. DerBorderSimplification

.o. ijRule

.o. slRule
.o. snjRule

.o. StrongNasalClusters
.o. olju
.o. iija
.o. StrongGrade
.o. dualposition
.o. QIIrealisation
.o. FinalLightT
.o. FinalLightD
.o. sClusterWeak
.o. StopCluster  
!.o. tkRule  
!.o. tmRule  

.o. 3rdSylld
!.o. rSchwa
!.o. dSchwa
!.o. lSchwa

.o. Preaspiration
.o. jPreaspiration

.o. VoicelessSonorant
.o. LatusLengthening
.o. PrimaryLenghtening
.o. PrimaryLenghteningII
.o. SecondaryLengthening
.o. SecondaryLengtheningNas
.o. WeakGrade
!.o. PlosiveDevoicing
!.o. HighVowelLenghtening

.o. VzzRule
.o. zzRule
.o. VzRule
.o. ptkRule
.o. bdgRule
.o. CttjRule
.o. ttjRule
.o. cRule
.o. LongPalatalAffricate
.o. SecondaryLengtheningPalAff
.o. ShortPalatalAffricate
.o. HighVowelLenghtening
.o. VowelLengthening
.o. OSlashLengthening
.o. VowelShortening
.o. DiphthongShorteningIIIGr
.o. DiphthongShorteningSecLng
.o. DiphthongShorteningAllegro
.o. eaRule
.o. backaRule 
.o. straRule  
.o. shortaRule
.o. aaRule
.o. PronounLenghtening
.o. PrimStress
.o. SecStress
.o. SecStress
.o. SecStress

.o. OUTPUTFORMAT
.o. OUTPUTFORMAT2
.o. COLONLENGTH
.o. COLONLENGTH
.o. COLONLENGTH
!.o. COLONLENGTHSYLL
.o. DummyDeletion
.o. DerBorderSimplification
.o. HyphenDeletion

] ;


invert net


!  For reference: The SAMPA - IPA correspondence

!  SAMPA   IPA  Description
!  p       p    voiceless bilabial stop
!  b       b    voiced bilabial stop
!  t       t    voiceless alveolar or dental stop
!  d       d    voiced alveolar or dental stop
!  ts      ʦ    voiceless alveolar affricate
!  dz      ʣ    voiced alveolar affricate
!  tS      ʧ    voiceless postalveolar affricate
!  dZ      ʤ    voiced postalveolar affricate
!  c       c    voiceless palatal stop
!  J\      ɟ    (overstroked j)    voiced palatal stop
!  k       k    voiceless velar stop
!  g       g    voiced velar stop
!  q       q    voiceless uvular stop
!  p\      ɸ    (Greek phi)    voiceless bilabial fricative
!  B       β    (Greek beta)    voiced bilabial fricative
!          ϐ    (Greek beta alt)    voiced bilabial approximant
!  f       f    voiceless labiodental fricative
!  v       v    voiced labiodental fricative
!  T       θ    (Greek theta)    voiceless dental fricative
!          ϑ    (Greek theta alt)    voiceless dental approximant
!  D       ð    (Icelandic eth)    voiced dental fricative
!          δ    (Greek delta)    voiced dental approximant
!  s       s    voiceless alveolar fricative
!  z       z    voiced alveolar fricative
!  S       ʃ    voiceless postalveolar fricative
!  Z       ʒ    voiced postalveolar fricative
!  C       ç    (cedilla)    voiceless palatal fricative
!  j\ (jj) ʝ    (j with crossed tail)    voiced palatal fricative
!  x       x    voiceless velar fricative
!  G       γ    (Greek gamma)    voiced velar fricative
!          ɰ    voiced velar approximant
!  X\      ħ    (overstroked h)    voiceless pharyngeal fricative
!  ?\      ʕ    (Inverted ?)    voiced pharyngeal fricative
!  ?       ʔ    glottal stop
!  h       h    voiceless glottal approximant
!  h\      ɦ    (h with upper tail to the right)    voiced glottal approximant
!  m       m    bilabial nasal
!  F       ɱ    (m with downward right tail)    labiodental nasal
!  n       n    alveolar or dental nasal
!  J       ɲ    (n with downward left tail)    palatal nasal
!  N       ŋ    (n with downward right tail)    velar nasal
!  l       l    alveolar lateral
!  L       ʎ    turned down y, alt. λ (Greek lambda)    palatal lateral
!  5       ɫ    (l with middle tilde)    velarized dental lateral
!  4 (r)   ɾ    (r without upper-left serif)    alveolar flap
!  r (rr)  r    alveolar trill
!  r\      ɹ    (r rotated 180°)    retroflexed alveolar approximant
!  R       ʀ    (small capital R)    uvular trill
!  P       ʋ    labiodental approximant
!  w       w    velo-labial approximant
!  H       ɥ    (turned down h)    palato-labial approximant
!  j       j    palatal approximant
!  
!  Vowels - SAMPA:
!                front   near-front    central   near-back   back
!  close          i • y                1 • }                 M • u
!  near-close              I • Y                     U
!  close-mid      e • 2               @\ • 8                 7 • o
!  mid                                   @            
!  open-mid       E • 9                3 • 3\        z        V • O
!  near-open        {                     6           
!  open           a • &                                      A • Q

!  Vowels - IPA:
!                Front   Near-​front   Central     Near-​back   Back
! Close           i • y                ɨ • ʉ                 ɯ • u
! Near-close               ɪ • ʏ       ɪ̈ • ʊ̈          ʊ
! Close-mid       e • ø                ɘ • ɵ                 ɤ • o
! Mid             e̞ • ø̞                  ə                   ɤ̞ • o̞
! Open-mid        ɛ • œ                ɜ • ɞ                 ʌ • ɔ
! Near-open       æ                      ɐ
! Open            a • ɶ                  ä                   ɑ • ɒ


! More documentation
